Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-320
Acceptable mail-in forms; official registration applications; distribution; proceeds; how credited.

The only mail-in forms which may be used to register to vote shall be the official registration application prescribed by the Secretary of State or the national mail voter registration application prescribed by the federal Election Assistance Commission. The Secretary of State shall provide such official registration applications to all recruitment offices of the United States Armed Forces in the State of Nebraska. The counties and state agencies listed in section 32-310 shall purchase such official registration applications from the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall remit proceeds from the sale of such applications to the State Treasurer for credit to the Election Administration Fund.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 82;

Laws 2003, LB 14, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 358, § 9;

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 21.